Maryland, session 2025, HB0596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–115.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “CHILD WITH A DISABILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
8–401 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “Dependent child” means an individual of school age who is a natural
child, a stepchild, an adopted child, or a financially dependent child of a service member.
[(3)] (4) “Enrollment” includes course registration and charter school
lotteries.
(5) “FREE APPROPRIATE PUBLIC EDUCATION” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 8–401 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(6) “SENDING STATE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–1303 OF THIS
TITLE.
[(4)] (7) (i) “Service member” means an active duty member of the
United States armed forces UNIFORMED SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
(ii) “Service member” includes a member of the National Guard OR
A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES, AS
DEFINED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101, on active duty orders.
(b) (1) [A] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A county superintendent shall allow a dependent
child of a service member who is relocating to the State on military orders and is not
domiciled in that county during the enrollment period to apply for ADVANCE enrollment in
a public school in the county[, in the same manner and at the same time as individuals
domiciled in the county].

HOUSE BILL 596 3
(2) TO ADVANCE ENROLL UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A SERVICE MEMBER SHALL PROVIDE TO A COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT
MILITARY ORDERS EVIDENCING THAT THE SERVICE MEMBER WILL BE STATIONED IN
THE STATE DURING THE CURRENT OR IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING SCHOOL YEAR.
(3) (I) A COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT SHALL ESTABLISH A REMOTE
REGISTRATION PROCESS FOR ADVANCE ENROLLMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) A REMOTE REGISTRATION PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER
THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT:
1. CHARGE A FEE; OR
2. REQUIRE THE SERVICE MEMBER OR OTHER PARENT
OR GUARDIAN OR THE DEPENDENT CHILD TO PHYSICALLY APPEAR AT A LOCATION
WITHIN THE COUNTY TO COMPLETE ANY PART OF THE ADVANCE ENROLLMENT
PROCESS.
(4) ON RECEIPT OF A VALID ADVANCE ENROLLMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION, IF THE DEPENDENT CHILD OF THE SERVICE MEMBER IS A CHILD WITH A
DISABILITY WHO IS RECEIVING SPECIAL EDUCATION AND SERVICES IN THE SENDING
STATE EQUIVALENT TO A FREE APPROPRIATE PUBLIC EDUCATION, THE LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM ENROLLING THE CHILD PROMPTLY SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE
CHILD’S PARENTS OR GUARDIANS AND THE SCHOOL DISTRICT IN THE SENDING
STATE TO PREVENT UNDUE DELAY IN TRANSFERRING THE CHILD TO THE STATE
(I) THE REMOTE REGISTRATION PROCESS SHALL PROVIDE AN
OPPORTUNITY FOR THE SERVICE MEMBER OR OTHER PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A
DEPENDENT CHILD TO NOTE WHETHER THE CHILD HAS AN INDIVIDUALIZED
EDUCATION PROGRAM OR A 504 PLAN IN THE SENDING STATE.
(II) IF A DEPENDENT CHILD HAS AN INDIVIDUALIZED
EDUCATION PROGRAM OR A 504 PLAN IN THE SENDING STATE, THE COUNTY BOARD
SHALL ENSURE THAT THE CHILD RECEIVES AN APPROPRIATE EDUCATION WITHOUT
UNDUE DELAY IN THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE CHILD ADVANCE ENROLLS,
INCLUDING, IF APPROPRIATE, EDUCATION UNDER AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION
PROGRAM OR IN ACCORDANCE WITH A 504 PLAN.
(III) A COUNTY BOARD SHALL COORDINATE WITH A CHILD’S
PARENT OR GUARDIAN AND THE SCHOOL SYSTEM IN THE SENDING STATE IN ORDER
TO CARRY OUT THIS PARAGRAPH.

HOUSE BILL 596
(c) (1) [Within] TO FINALIZE ADVANCE ENROLLMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION, WITHIN 10 days of the published arrival date on the service member’s military
orders, the service member shall provide the school with:
(i) Satisfactory evidence of the dependent child’s status as a
dependent child of the service member;
(ii) A copy of the service member’s military orders to relocate; and
(iii) Proof of residence in the county.
(2) The service member may use the address of any of the following as proof
of residence:
(i) A temporary on–base lodging facility;
(ii) A purchased or leased home or apartment; or
(iii) Any federal government housing unit or off–base military
housing unit.
(D) (1) A NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A
DEPENDENT CHILD OF A SERVICE MEMBER WHO ADVANCE ENROLLS HAS USED
ADVANCE ENROLLMENT TO ENROLL IN A SCHOOL UNDER THIS SECTION MAY
REMAIN ENROLLED IN SCHOOL UNTIL COMPLETION OF THE HIGHEST GRADE LEVEL
AVAILABLE AT THE SCHOOL THE SCHOOL UNTIL THE END OF THE CURRENT SCHOOL
YEAR, EVEN IF THE CHILD NO LONGER MEETS THE RESIDENCY REQUIREMENTS OF
THE SCHOOL.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A A
DEPENDENT CHILD OF A SERVICE MEMBER WHO USES ADVANCE ENROLLMENT
SHALL HAVE ACCESS TO ALL ACADEMIC COURSES AND PROGRAMS, INCLUDING
EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITIES AND ATHLETIC AND SOCIAL PROGRAMS, WHEN
USING ADVANCE ENROLLMENT IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STUDENTS
ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL.
(E) THE SECRETARY OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE MILITARY FAMILY EDUCATION LIAISON DESIGNATED
UNDER § 7–1303 OF THIS TITLE AND THE OFFICE OF MILITARY AND FEDERAL
AFFAIRS AND THE MARYLAND MILITARY INSTALLATION COUNCIL IN THE
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, SHALL PUBLISH AND MAINTAIN INFORMATION ON:
(1) THE ADVANCE ENROLLMENT PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED UNDER
THIS SECTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 596 5
(2) ANY ASSISTANCE AND SERVICES AVAILABLE TO SERVICE
MEMBERS REGARDING THE ADVANCE ENROLLMENT OF A DEPENDENT CHILD,
INCLUDING A CHILD WITH A DISABILITY ENTITLED TO RECEIVE A FREE
APPROPRIATE PUBLIC EDUCATION IN THE STATE.
8–401.
(a) (1) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Child with a disability” means a child who has been determined
through appropriate assessment as having autism, deaf–blindness, hearing impairment,
including deafness, emotional disability, intellectual disability, multiple disabilities,
orthopedic impairment, other health impairment, specific learning disability, speech or
language impairment, traumatic brain injury, visual impairment, including blindness, and
who because of that impairment needs special education and related services.
(3) “Free appropriate public education” means special education and
related services that:
(i) Are provided at public expense, under public supervision and
direction, at no cost to the parents;
(ii) Meet the standards of the State Board regulations and the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.);
(iii) Includes preschool, elementary, and secondary education; and
(iv) Are provided in conformance with the requirements of the child’s
individualized education program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.